District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

46-708

Representation of plaintiff by Corporation Counsel or private counsel.

Repealed.

History

July 10, 1957, 71 Stat. 286, Pub. L. 85-94, § 8
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-166, § 33(f)(2), 33 DCR 6710
Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 902, 42 DCR 6748

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-308.
1973 Ed., § 30-308.